District of Columbia statutes.
47-4480

Liability for failure or refusal to surrender.

A person who fails or refuses to surrender property subject to distraint on which a levy has been made shall be liable to the District of Columbia for the value of the property not surrendered, but not exceeding the amount of the taxes, including interest and penalties, for which the levy has been made, together with costs and interest thereon from the date of the levy.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 405(b), 48 DCR 334